Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Municipal  Solid Waste in the Willamette Valley is
established.
(2) The task force consists of 12 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two nonvoting members  from among
members of the Senate, including one member from  the majority party and one member
from the minority party.
(b) The Speaker of the House of  Representatives shall appoint two nonvoting members
from among members of the  House of Representatives, including one member from the ma-
jority party and one member from the minority party.
(c) The Governor shall appoint eight members as follows:
(A) One member to represent the Governor;
(B) One member to represent a  private hauler of solid waste that operates a landfill in
the Willamette Valley;
(C) One member to represent the League of Oregon Cities;
(D) One member to represent the Association of Oregon Counties;
(E) Two members to represent environmental organizations; and
(F) Two members with subject matter expertise in the disposal of municipal solid waste.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Study and identify solutions for solid waste disposal in the Willamette Valley; and
(b) Review the findings and recommendations of the Regional Sustainable Materials
Management Plan Task Force convened by Benton County.
(4) The Task Force on Municipal Solid  Waste in the Willamette Valley may adopt the
findings or recommendations of the Regional Sustainable Materials Management  Plan Task
Force.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the Task Force on  Municipal Solid Waste in the
Willamette Valley constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the voting
members of the task force.
Enrolled House Bill 3794 (HB 3794-INTRO) Page 1
(7) The Governor shall select one member of the  task force to serve as chairperson and
another to serve as vice chairperson, for the terms and with the duties and powers necessary
for the performance of the functions of the offices as the Governor determines.
(8) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the  interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to the environment no later than December 15, 2026.
(12) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall provide staff  support to the task
force.
(13) Members  of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members  of the task force who are not members of the Legislative Assembly serve
as volunteers on the task force and, unless they are qualified members, as defined in ORS
292.495, are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
(16) All appointments to the task force made under subsection (2) of this  section must
be completed no later than 60 days after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(17) The task  force shall have its first meeting no later than 90 days after the effective
date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3794 (HB 3794-INTRO) Page 2